Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2205XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 80 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13D Students with 1 individualized education programs ââ eligibility for 2 extracurricular interscholastic athletic games or competitions. 3 1. The lead special education teacher described 4 in a studentâs individualized education program shall 5 determine whether the student is eligible to participate in 6 extracurricular interscholastic athletic games or competitions 7 provided by the public school or nonpublic school in which 8 the student is enrolled. A coach or athletic director 9 employed by the public school or a nonpublic school shall not 10 determine whether such student is eligible to participate in 11 extracurricular interscholastic athletic games or competitions. 12 2. When determining whether a student with an 13 individualized education program is eligible to participate in 14 extracurricular interscholastic athletic games or competitions 15 provided by a public school or a nonpublic school pursuant to 16 subsection 1, the lead special education teacher shall consider 17 the studentâs record of attendance and whether the student is 18 attaining passing grades in the studentâs classes. 19 3. This section shall not apply to students who require 20 special education under chapter 256B and who have severe and 21 profound disabilities. 22